Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1661
Jurors; appearance; failure to appear or serve without good cause; contempt of court.

(1) Each grand juror and petit juror summoned shall appear before the court on the day and at the hour specified in the summons or as further directed by the court.

(2) Any person summoned for jury service who fails to appear or to complete jury service as directed may be ordered by the court to appear forthwith and show cause for such failure to comply with the summons. If such person fails to show good cause for noncompliance with the summons, he or she shall be guilty of contempt of court.

(3) No person shall be guilty of contempt of court under this section for failing to respond to a summons sent:

(a) By first-class mail, if sent pursuant to a one-step qualifying and summoning system, and if the person has (i) returned a juror qualification form and the jury commissioner has determined that such person is not qualified; (ii) been excused from jury service; or (iii) had his or her jury service postponed; or

(b) Through a jury management system.

R.S.1867, Code § 663, p. 511;

R.S.1913, § 8142;

C.S.1922, § 9077;

C.S.1929, § 20-1607;

R.S.1943, (2016), § 25-1607;

Laws 2020, LB387, § 18.